Utah statutes.
31A-17-202.   Status of assets that are not "qualified assets."
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), if an insurer owns assets
that are not qualified assets under Section 31A-17-201, the assets shall be
disregarded in determining and reporting the financial condition of the
insurer.
(b)  An insurer may invest its funds in investments that are permitted under
Section 31A-18-105 but in excess of the limits under Sections 31A-18-103 and
31A-18-106 or other assets approved by the commissioner and these assets may
be recognized and reported in the financial condition of the insurer to the
extent the insurer has excess surplus, as defined under Section 31A-1-301.
(2)  Insurers bear the burden of establishing the extent to which they have
excess surplus.
